Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.190

Acceptance of electronic payments—Transaction processing costs.

(1) County treasurers are authorized to accept electronic payments for payment of any kind including, but not limited to, payment for taxes, fines, interest, penalties, special assessments, fees, rates, charges, or moneys due counties.

(a) The county treasurer must determine the amount of the transaction processing cost for electronic payments. The county treasurer's determination must be based upon costs incurred by the treasurer and may not, in any event, exceed the additional direct costs incurred by the county to accept the specific form of payment utilized by the payer.

(b) A payer using electronic payment must pay the transaction processing cost, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) For payments for taxes, interest associated with taxes, and penalties associated with taxes that are made by automatic clearinghouse system, federal wire, or other electronic communication, any fee associated with the transaction may be absorbed within the county treasurer's banking services budget.

(3) A county treasurer may elect to not charge transaction processing costs for all payments made for a specific category of nontax payments if the county legislative authority, or the legislative authority of a district where the county treasurer serves as ex officio treasurer, finds that not charging such transaction processing costs is in the best interests of the county or district. Interest and penalties associated with such transaction processing costs may be absorbed by the county department or taxing district assessing the payment transactions.

(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Electronic payment" means a payment made using the following: Credit cards, charge cards, debit cards, smart cards, stored value cards, federal wire, automatic clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic communication;

(b) "Nontax payments" means payments received by the county treasurer that include payments for fines, interest not associated with taxes, penalties not associated with taxes, special assessments, fees, rates, charges, or moneys due counties; and

(c) "Transaction processing cost" means the cost of processing an electronic payment as determined by the county treasurer. This cost is based on costs incurred by the county treasurer and may not exceed the additional direct costs incurred by the county to accept a specific form of electronic payment utilized by the payer.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 5 s 1; 2003 c 23 s 8; 1997 c 393 s 19; 1996 c 153 s 3.]

NOTES:

Applicability—1996 c 153: See note following RCW 84.56.020.